Massachusetts, session 194th, S1635.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 24B ½ of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (c) and inserting thereof the following:-
(c) Collaborative drug therapy management shall only be allowed in the following
settings: (1) hospitals licensed pursuant to section 51 of chapter 111, subject to approval by the
medical staff executive committee at a licensed hospital or designee; (2) long-term care facilities
licensed pursuant to section 71 of chapter 111, subject to approval by the long-term care
facilities' medical director or designee; (3) inpatient or outpatient hospice settings licensed
pursuant to section 57D of chapter 111, subject to approval by the hospice's medical director or
designee; (4) ambulatory care clinics licensed pursuant to section 51 of chapter 111, with on-site
supervision by the attending physician and a collaborating pharmacist, subject to approval by the
of 2

ambulatory care clinic's medical staff executive committee or designee, or medical director or
designee; (5) collaborating pharmacists in a retail drug business, as registered in section 38 of
chapter 112 and limited by this section, with supervision by physicians according to the terms of
their collaborative practice agreements and limited to the following: patients 18 years of age or
older; an extension by 30 days of current drug therapy prescribed by the supervising physician;
and administration of vaccines or initiation of medications pursuant to a diagnosis,
discontinuation, and/or modification of dosages of medications prescribed by the supervising
physicians for substance use disorders, asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, diabetes,
hypertension, hyperlipidemia, congestive heart failure, HIV or AIDS, osteoporosis and co-
morbidities identified by the supervising physician for the individual patient along with the
primary diagnosis. The collaborative practice agreement shall specifically reference each disease
state being co-managed. A patient shall be referred by supervising physicians to that physicians’
collaborating pharmacists and shall be given notice of the collaboration and shall consent to the
collaboration. Pharmacists in the retail setting, who have a collaborative practice agreement with
supervising physicians which specifically allows initial prescriptions for referred patients of the
supervising physician, may issue prescriptions for schedule II-VI controlled substances, as
defined in clause 6 of section 3 of chapter 94C. Collaborative Practice Agreements with
pharmacists in a retail setting that include controlled substances shall only be used to treat
substance use disorders as defined by section 35 of chapter 123 or any disorder described in the
most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders. Such
prescriptions shall be for a patient diagnosis specified in the supervising physician's individual
referral of that patient. A copy of the prescription shall be sent to the supervising physician
within 24 hours.
of 2